Colorado, session 2026A, HB1194.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-110-101 as
follows:
12-110-101. Short title.
The short title of this article 110 is the "Colorado Professional
Boxing Safety Act" "COLORADO COMBATIVE SPORTS SAFETY ACT".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-110-116 as
follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

12-110-116. Repeal of article - subject to review.
This article 110 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER
1, 2037. Before the repeal, the office and the commission are scheduled for
review in accordance with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(V); and add (38)(a)(IV) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(V) The office of combative sports, including the Colorado
combative sports commission, created in article 110 of title 12;
(38) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2037:
(IV) THE OFFICE OF COMBATIVE SPORTS, INCLUDING THE COLORADO
COMBATIVE SPORTS COMMISSION, CREATED IN ARTICLE 110 OF TITLE 12.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-110-102 as
follows:
12-110-102. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that
the federal "Professional Boxing Safety Act of 1996", 15 U.S.C. sec. 6301
et seq., as amended, requires the state of Colorado to establish a state
boxing commission. Because there is no state boxing commission, any
professional boxing match held in Colorado has to be supervised by another
state's boxing commission, using safety guidelines and procedures
implemented by that state THE STATE HAS THEREFORE CREATED THE
COLORADO COMBATIVE SPORTS COMMISSION.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that it is in the
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

best interests of the residents of Colorado, professional boxing COMBATIVE
SPORTS participants, and the future of the sport of boxing COMBATIVE
SPORTS in Colorado that the conduct of the sport COMBATIVE SPORTS be
subject to an effective and efficient system of strict control designed by the
general assembly. The system shall, at a minimum:
(a) Protect the safety of the participants; and
(b) Promote the public trust and confidence in the conduct of
professional boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS.
(3) To further public confidence and trust, this article 110 and rules
promulgated ADOPTED pursuant to this article 110 shall regulate all persons,
practices, and associations that relate to the operation of live professional
boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS events, performances, or contests held in
Colorado.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-104, amend
(5), (8), (12), (14), (16)(a)(II), and (16)(b)(II); repeal (1); and add (2.7),
(6.8), (8.1), and (15.4) as follows:
12-110-104. Definitions.
As used in this article 110, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Boxer" means an individual who participates in a boxing match.
(2.7) (a) "COMBATIVE SPORT" OR "COMBATIVE SPORTS" MEANS A
COMPETITIVE PHYSICAL ACTIVITY THAT INVOLVES TWO OR MORE
INDIVIDUALS ENGAGING IN COMBAT WITH RULES THAT GOVERN CONDUCT,
CONTACT, SCORING, AND SAFETY.
(b) "COMBATIVE SPORT" OR "COMBATIVE SPORTS" INCLUDES
BOXING, KICKBOXING, MARTIAL ARTS, MIXED MARTIAL ARTS, MUAY THAI,
AND ANY OTHER COMBATIVE SPORT THE COMMISSION DEEMS, BY RULE, TO
BE REGULATED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 110.
(5) "Exhibition" means a match in which participants display their
boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS skills and techniques without striving earnestly
to win.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

(6.8) "MANAGER" MEANS A PERSON THAT PROPOSES, SELECTS, AND
ARRANGES THE CONTESTANTS TO PARTICIPATE IN A COMBATIVE SPORTS
MATCH.
(8) "Match" means a professional boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS
contest or exhibition, the object of which is to win by a decision, knockout,
or technical knockout, and includes an event, engagement, sparring or
practice session, show, or program where the public is admitted and there
is intended to be physical contact. "Match" does not include a training or
practice session when no A COST FOR admission is NOT charged.
(8.1) "MATCHMAKER" MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(a) PROPOSES, ARRANGES, OR SECURES A PARTICIPANT FOR A
COMBATIVE SPORTS MATCH; OR
(b) ASSISTS A PROMOTER IN PROPOSING, ARRANGING, OR SECURING
A PARTICIPANT FOR A COMBATIVE SPORTS MATCH.
(12) "Participant" means a person AN INDIVIDUAL who engages in
a match. as a boxing contestant.
(14) "Place of training" means a facility where alcohol beverages are
not permitted, an admission fee is not charged for nonstudents, instructors
of particular disciplines train students in the art of boxing COMBATIVE
SPORTS, and students pay a fee to be enrolled in classes and receive
instruction.
(15.4) (a) "PROMOTER" MEANS A PERSON PRIMARILY RESPONSIBLE
FOR ORGANIZING, PROMOTING, AND PRODUCING A COMBATIVE SPORTS
MATCH.
(b) "PROMOTER" DOES NOT INCLUDE A HOTEL, CASINO, RESORT, OR
OTHER COMMERCIAL ESTABLISHMENT HOSTING OR SPONSORING A
COMBATIVE SPORTS MATCH, UNLESS:
(I) THE HOTEL, CASINO, RESORT, OR OTHER COMMERCIAL
ESTABLISHMENT IS PRIMARILY RESPONSIBLE FOR ORGANIZING, PROMOTING,
AND PRODUCING THE MATCH; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

(II) THERE IS NO OTHER PERSON PRIMARILY RESPONSIBLE FOR
ORGANIZING, PROMOTING, AND PRODUCING THE MATCH.
(16) (a) "Toughperson fighting" means:
(II) A contest, match, tournament, exhibition, bout, or activity, as
described in subsection (16)(a)(I) of this section, that is not recognized by
and not sanctioned by any state, regional, or national boxing COMBATIVE
SPORTS sanctioning authority that is recognized by the director.
(b) "Toughperson fighting" does not mean:
(II) A sanctioned boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS event approved by the
commission.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-106, amend
(3); and add (2)(a.3) and (2)(a.5) as follows.
12-110-106. Colorado combative sports commission - creation
- repeal.
(2) (a.3) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a.3) AND SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION ARE REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026.
(a.5) (I) ON AND AFTER SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION
CONSISTS OF SEVEN MEMBERS. ALL MEMBERS ARE VOTING MEMBERS AND
MUST BE RESIDENTS OF COLORADO, BE OF GOOD CHARACTER, AND NOT HAVE
BEEN CONVICTED OF ANY FELONY OR MATCH-RELATED OFFENSE,
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-5-101. THE MEMBERS SHALL BE APPOINTED
AS FOLLOWS:
(A) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THREE MEMBERS;
(B) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT TWO MEMBERS,
ONE OF WHOM MUST BE A PHYSICIAN WHO HAS RELEVANT EXPERIENCE OR
TRAINING IN EMERGENCY, SPORTS, OR COMBATIVE SPORTS MEDICINE; AND
(C) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SHALL
APPOINT TWO MEMBERS, ONE OF WHOM MUST BE A PHYSICIAN WHO HAS
RELEVANT EXPERIENCE OR TRAINING IN EMERGENCY, SPORTS, OR
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

COMBATIVE SPORTS MEDICINE.
(II) THE TWO PHYSICIAN MEMBERS SHALL ADVISE THE COMMISSION
ON MATTERS CONCERNING THE HEALTH AND PHYSICAL CONDITION OF
PARTICIPANTS AND HEALTH ISSUES RELATING TO THE CONDUCT OF MATCHES.
THE PHYSICIAN MEMBERS MAY PREPARE AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION
FOR ITS CONSIDERATION AND APPROVAL ANY RULES THAT IN THEIR
JUDGMENT WILL SAFEGUARD THE PHYSICAL WELFARE OF THE PARTICIPANTS
ENGAGED IN COMBATIVE SPORTS. THE PHYSICIAN MEMBERS ARE VOTING
MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION.
(3) Meetings of the commission shall be held at least annually, and
shall be called by the chair or by any two members of the commission, and
shall MUST be open to the public. Any three voting FOUR members shall
constitute a quorum at any meeting. Action may be taken and motions and
resolutions may be adopted at any meeting at which a quorum exists by the
affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members present. Members may
participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting
through the use of, any means of communication by which all members
participating may simultaneously hear one another at all times during the
meeting. A member participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to
be present in person at the meeting.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-107, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(a), (1)(k), and (1)(l)(III); and add (1)(m), (1.1),
and (1.5) as follows:
12-110-107. General powers and duties of the commission -
rules.
(1) In addition to any other powers specifically granted to the
commission in this article 110, the commission shall issue ADOPT rules as
necessary for the regulation of the conduct, promotion, and performance of
live boxing matches in this state. The rules must be consistent with this
article 110; the federal "Professional Boxing Safety Act of 1996", 15 U.S.C.
sec. 6301 et seq.; as amended, and any other applicable federal law. The
commission's rules must include:
(a) Requirements for issuance of licenses and permits for boxers,
seconds, inspectors, promoters, judges, and referees PARTICIPANTS,
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

CORNERS, AND OFFICIALS;
(k) Regulation of facilities; and
(l) Procedures to:
(III) Allow the director to report a nondisciplinary participant
license suspension to a national record keeper approved by the director;
AND
(m) PROVISIONS INTENDED TO ENSURE THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF
PARTICIPANTS.
(1.1) WHEN ADOPTING RULES INTENDED TO ENSURE THE HEALTH
AND SAFETY OF PARTICIPANTS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(m) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW AND CONSIDER THE SAFETY DATA
GATHERED AND PROVIDED TO IT BY THE OFFICE DIRECTOR PURSUANT TO
SECTION 12-110-110 (3)(a)(IV).
(1.5) THE COMMISSION SHALL IDENTIFY, BY RULE, THE COMBATIVE
SPORTS TO WHICH THIS ARTICLE 110 APPLIES.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-110-108 as
follows:
12-110-108. License required.
No A person shall NOT participate, officiate, judge, referee, promote,
or second a professional boxing arts contest OR CORNER A MATCH unless the
person is licensed pursuant to this article 110.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-110, amend
(3)(a) introductory portion, (3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), (3)(b) introductory portion,
and (3)(b)(II); and add (3)(a)(IV) as follows:
12-110-110. Office director - appointment - qualification -
powers and duties - director of division's powers and duties.
(3) (a) In addition to the ALL OTHER duties imposed upon the office
director elsewhere in this article 110, the office director shall, in accordance
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

with this article 110 and the rules of the commission:
(II) Supervise and administer the operation of matches; and
(III) As deemed necessary by the director of the division, advise and
make recommendations to the director of the division with regard to the
director of the division's functions; AND
(IV) GATHER DATA RELATED TO ENSURING THE HEALTH AND SAFETY
OF PARTICIPANTS TO PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION FOR THE COMMISSION TO
CONSIDER WHEN IT ISSUES RULES PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-110-107.
(b) In addition to the ALL OTHER duties imposed upon the director
of the division elsewhere in this article 110, the director of the division
shall:
(II) Advise and recommend to the commission rules and other
procedures as the director of the division deems necessary and advisable to
improve the conduct of boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS;
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-111, amend
(1) introductory portion, (1)(e), (1)(g)(I), (1)(h), and (2)(b)(IV); and add
(1)(i) as follows:
12-110-111. Grounds for discipline.
(1) The director may take disciplinary or other action as authorized
in section 12-20-404 against a license LICENSEE or an application
APPLICANT for a license if the applicant or licensee:
(e) Has incurred disciplinary action related to professional boxing
COMBATIVE SPORTS in another jurisdiction. Evidence of disciplinary action
is prima facie evidence for denial of a license or other disciplinary action
if the violation would be grounds for disciplinary action in this state.
(g) Is guilty of conduct, or is incompetent or negligent in a manner,
that:
(I) Is detrimental to a contest or exhibition of boxing MATCH,
including unsportsmanlike conduct engaged in before, during, or after a
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

contest or exhibition of boxing; or MATCH;
(h) Fails to comply with a limitation, restriction, or condition that
the director or any other state or national regulatory authority responsible
for regulating boxing COMBATIVE SPORTS places on the licensee or
applicant; OR
(i) FAILS TO RESPOND TO A LETTER FROM THE DIVISION REGARDING
A COMPLAINT AGAINST THE LICENSEE OR APPLICANT WITHIN THE LENGTH OF
TIME SPECIFIED IN THE LETTER.
(2) (b) Upon completing an investigation in accordance with section
12-20-403, the director shall make one of the following findings:
(IV) The investigation discloses an instance of conduct that does not
warrant formal action but should not be dismissed as being without merit.
If this finding is made, the director may send a letter of admonition to the
licensee in accordance with section 12-20-404 (4). by certified mail.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-110-112
as follows:
12-110-112. Toughperson fighting prohibited - promoter and
manager financial interest prohibited.
(1) (a) Toughperson fighting is prohibited in the state of Colorado.
No A person or entity shall NOT promote, advertise, conduct, or compete or
participate in toughperson fighting. No A license or permit shall NOT be
issued for toughperson fighting or for any contests or exhibitions of a
similar nature.
(b) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS A CLASS
2 MISDEMEANOR AND SHALL BE PUNISHED AS PROVIDED IN SECTION
18-1.3-501.
(2) Any violation of this section is a class 2 misdemeanor and shall
be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.
(3) A PROMOTER OR MATCHMAKER SHALL NOT HAVE A DIRECT OR
INDIRECT FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE MANAGEMENT OF A PARTICIPANT.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

(4) A MANAGER SHALL NOT:
(a) HAVE A DIRECT OR INDIRECT FINANCIAL INTEREST IN THE
PROMOTION OF A PARTICIPANT;
(b) BE EMPLOYED BY A PROMOTER OR MATCHMAKER; OR
(c) RECEIVE COMPENSATION OR OTHER BENEFIT FROM A PROMOTER
OR MATCHMAKER, EXCEPT FOR AN AMOUNT RECEIVED AS CONSIDERATION
PURSUANT TO THE MANAGER'S CONTRACT WITH THE PARTICIPANT.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-115, amend
(2) as follows:
12-110-115. Violations.
(2) Criminal penalties. Any A person who THAT engages in or
offers or attempts to engage in the conduct, promotion, or performance of
live boxing matches without an active license or permit issued under this
article 110 is subject to penalties pursuant to section 12-20-407 (1)(a).
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-407, amend
(1)(a)(II) as follows:
12-20-407. Unauthorized practice of profession or occupation -
penalties - exclusions.
(1) (a) A person commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be
punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501 if the person:
(II) Engages in or offers or attempts to engage in the conduct,
promotion, or performance of live boxing matches without an active license
or permit issued under article 110 of this title 12;
SECTION 14. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1194

such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1194